Utah statutes.
4-20-2.   Rangeland Improvement Account -- Administered by department.

(1) (a)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Rangeland Improvement Account."

(b)  The restricted account shall consist of:

(i)  money received by the state from the United States Secretary of Interior under the Taylor Grazing Act, 43 U.S.C. Section 315 et seq., for sales, leases, and fees;

(ii)  grants or appropriations from the state or federal government; and

(iii)  grants from private foundations.

(c)  Interest earned on the restricted account shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(2)  The department shall:

(a)  administer the restricted account;

(b)  obtain from the United States Department of Interior the receipts collected from:

(i)  fees in each grazing district; and

(ii)  the receipts collected from the sale or lease of public lands; and

(c)  distribute restricted account money in accordance with Section 4-20-3.

